Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 6. Office of Public Advocacy.

Administrative Code. —

For office of public advocacy, see 2 AAC 60.

Sec. 44.21.400.
Public advocacy office established.

There is created in the Department of Administration the office of public advocacy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.21.410.
Powers and duties.

The office of public advocacy shall

perform the duties of the public guardian under AS

13.26.700

—

13.26.750

;

provide visitors and experts in guardianship proceedings under AS

13.26.291

;

provide guardian ad litem services to children in child protection actions under AS

47.17.030(e)

and to wards and respondents in guardianship proceedings who will suffer financial hardship or become dependent upon a government agency or a private person or agency if the services are not provided at state expense under AS

13.26.041

;

provide legal representation in cases involving judicial bypass procedures for minors seeking abortions under AS

18.16.030

, in guardianship proceedings to respondents who are financially unable to employ attorneys under AS

13.26.226(b)

, to indigent parties in cases involving child custody in which the opposing party is represented by counsel provided by a public agency, and to indigent parents or guardians of a minor respondent in a commitment proceeding concerning the minor under AS

47.30.775

;

provide legal representation and guardian ad litem services under AS

25.24.310

; in cases arising under AS 47.15 (Interstate Compact for Juveniles); in cases involving petitions to adopt a minor under AS

25.23.125(b)

or petitions for the termination of parental rights under AS

25.23.180(c)(2)

; in cases involving petitions to remove the disabilities of a minor under AS

09.55.590

; in children’s proceedings under AS

47.10.050(a)

or under AS

47.12.090

; in cases involving appointments under AS

18.66.100(a)

in petitions for protective orders on behalf of a minor; and in cases involving indigent persons who are entitled to representation under AS

18.85.100

and who cannot be represented by the public defender agency because of a conflict of interests;

develop and coordinate a program to recruit, select, train, assign, and supervise volunteer guardians ad litem from local communities to aid in delivering services in cases in which the office of public advocacy is appointed as guardian ad litem;

Provide guardian ad litem services in proceedings under AS

12.45.046

or AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

;

establish a fee schedule and collect fees for services provided by the office, except as provided in AS

18.85.120

or when imposition or collection of a fee is not in the public interest as defined under regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration;

provide visitors and guardians ad litem in proceedings under AS

47.30.839

;

provide legal representation to an indigent parent of a child with a disability; in this paragraph, “child with a disability” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

;

investigate complaints and bring civil actions under AS

44.21.415(a)

involving fraud committed against residents of the state who are 60 years of age or older; in this paragraph, “fraud” has the meaning given in AS

44.21.415

.

The commissioner of administration may

adopt regulations that the commissioner considers necessary to implement AS

44.21.400

—

44.21.470

;

report on the operation of the office of public advocacy when requested by the governor or legislature or when required by law;

solicit and accept grants of funds from governments and from persons, and allocate or restrict the use of those funds as required by the grantor.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1984; am § 21 ch 140 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 50 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 2 ch 5 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1992; am § 25 ch 77 SLA 1993; am § 10 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 64 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 14 SLA 1997; am § 38 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 28 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 11 ch 54 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 2009; am § 18 ch 24 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (a)(7) was enacted as (a)(6); renumbered in 1988. Paragraph (a)(9) was enacted as (a)(8); renumbered in 1992.

In 2016, in subsection (a) several cross references to renumbered sections were conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For compensation for volunteer professionals, see 2 AAC 60, art. 1.

For fees for guardian and conservator services, see 2 AAC 60, art. 2.

For office of elder fraud and assistance, see 2 AAC 60, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(4) added “and” following “provided by a public agency”, and in (a)(5), substituted “Interstate Compact for Juveniles” for “Uniform Interstate Compact on Juveniles”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 13, 2018, in (a)(5), substituted “under AS

25.23.180(c)(2)

” for “on grounds set out in AS 25.23.180(c)(3)” following “termination of parental rights”.

Sec. 44.21.415.
Office of elder fraud and assistance.

The office of elder fraud and assistance is established in the office of public advocacy to investigate complaints involving fraud committed against older Alaskans who are not otherwise able to bring a complaint without assistance, as defined in regulation, and to provide assistance to older Alaskans who are victims of fraud. The office shall work with local, state, and national law enforcement and social service agencies through cooperative agreements and may bring civil enforcement actions for injunctive and other relief for fraud committed against older Alaskans.

In conducting an investigation under this section, the office of elder fraud and assistance may issue subpoenas, conduct interviews, and examine the business records, advances, transactions, and relevant records associated with the alleged fraud committed against an older Alaskan. The office may enter into contracts with attorneys and seek a court order to enforce a subpoena.

In addition to the functions described under (a) and (b) of this section, the office of elder fraud and assistance shall provide information, referrals, and other assistance to older Alaskans who are victims of fraud and make recommendations to the commissioner for regulations on eligibility for assistance needed to implement this section.

A cooperative agreement under (a) of this section must include a description of office operations and investigation protocols.

Subject to the discretion of the court and standards established in regulation adopted by the commissioner of administration and taking into consideration the financial condition of the parties to a civil suit brought under this section, the office of public advocacy may seek recovery of all or part of litigation costs and fees from any party, including costs incurred during the investigation of the case, when the office of public advocacy is found to be a prevailing party after trial or settlement negotiation. The office of public advocacy shall enter into a fee agreement with a client that is consistent with this section, the Alaska Rules of Court, and the Alaska Rules of Professional Conduct.

Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Law from investigating or prosecuting a person for unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of trade or commerce under AS

45.50.471

and

45.50.495

.

In this section,

“fraud” means

robbery, extortion, and coercion under AS

11.41.500

—

11.41.530

;

offenses against property under AS

11.46.100

—

11.46.740

; or

exploitation of another person or another person’s resources for personal profit or advantage with no significant benefit accruing to the person who is exploited;

“older Alaskan” means a person residing in the state who is 60 years of age or older.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 2006; am § 15 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For office of elder fraud and assistance, see 2 AAC 60, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (g)(1)(B), substituted “offenses against property” for “theft and related offenses”.

Sec. 44.21.420.
Employment of office personnel.

The commissioner of administration may employ guardians ad litem, public guardians, clerical staff, and other assistants that the commissioner determines are needed to perform the duties set out in AS

44.21.410

. Employees under this subsection are in the classified service under AS

39.25.100

.

The commissioner of administration may employ attorneys needed to perform the duties set out in AS

44.21.410

. Attorneys employed by the commissioner of administration in the office of public advocacy are in the partially exempt service under AS

39.25.120

.

The commissioner of administration may contract for services of court-appointed visitors and experts needed to perform the duties set out in AS

44.21.410

. The commissioner may contract with attorneys to provide legal representation, and with other persons to provide guardian ad litem services, as needed to perform the duties set out in AS

44.21.410

. The commissioner may determine the rate of compensation for contractual services, taking into account the time involved, the skill and experience required, and other pertinent factors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Sec. 44.21.430.
Attorneys engaged by public advocacy office.

Only an attorney admitted to the practice of law in this state may be retained under contract by the office of public advocacy to provide legal representation. A person is not eligible to be an attorney employed by the office unless admitted to the practice of law in this state no later than 10 months following the commencement of the person’s employment by the office.

An attorney employed by the office of public advocacy may not engage in the private practice of law unless the attorney provides services to the office as an independent contractor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 88 SLA 1996)

Sec. 44.21.440.
Conflicts of interests.

Services and legal representation rendered by the office of public advocacy, whether performed by a person under contract or by an employee of the office, shall be provided in a manner that avoids conflicts of interests.

The office of public advocacy may not use improper pressure to influence the professional judgment of a person who is paid by the office of public advocacy to act as an attorney, a guardian ad litem, or a visitor for a guardianship or conservatorship established under AS 13.26.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1984; am § 29 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Sec. 44.21.450.
Civil liability of volunteer guardians.

A volunteer guardian ad litem under the supervision of the office of public advocacy is not civilly liable for acts or omissions during the good faith performance of duties as a guardian unless the acts or omissions constitute gross negligence.

This section does not affect the civil liability of the office of public advocacy.

History.

(§ 3 ch 5 SLA 1988)

Sec. 44.21.460.
Nonattorney volunteer guardians ad litem.

A nonattorney volunteer guardian ad litem may not give legal advice or act in the capacity of attorney for a minor before a court or administrative agency.

History.

(§ 3 ch 5 SLA 1988)

Sec. 44.21.470.
Definition.

In AS

44.21.410

—

44.21.460

, “volunteer guardian ad litem” means a court-appointed special advocate (CASA).

History.

(§ 3 ch 5 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.490.
Renumbered in 1988.

Secs. 44.21.500 — 44.21.508.
Office of Equal Employment Opportunity. [Repealed, E.O. No. 91 § 3 (1995).]